Alaska statutes. Title 43. Revenue and Taxation.
Article 2. Allocation and Apportionment.

Secs. 43.20.080 — 43.20.140.
Allocation of nonbusiness income; net rents and royalties; capital gains and losses; interests and dividends; patent and copyright royalties; allocation of business income; apportionment by commissioner. [Repealed, § 13 ch 70 SLA 1975.]

Sec. 43.20.141.
Income from sources in the state of nonresident partners.

In determining the source of a nonresident partner’s income, effect may not be given to a provision in the partnership agreement that

characterizes payments to the partner as being for services or for the use of capital;

allocates to the partner, as income or gain from sources outside the state, a greater proportion of the partner’s distributive share of partnership income or gain than the ratio of partnership income or gain from sources outside the state to partnership income or gain from all sources; or

allocates to the partner a greater proportion of a partnership item of loss or deduction connected to Alaska sources than the partner’s proportionate share, for federal income tax purposes of partnership loss or education generally.

History.

(§ 8 ch 70 SLA 1975)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

43.20.051

. Renumbered in 2012.

Sec. 43.20.142.
Allocation and apportionment.

A taxpayer who has income from business activity that is taxable both inside and outside the state or income from other sources both inside and outside the state shall allocate and apportion net income as provided in AS 43.19 (Multistate Tax Compact), or as provided by this chapter.

History.

(§ 8 ch 70 SLA 1975; am § 23 ch 113 SLA 1980)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly
AS

43.20.065

. Renumbered in 2012.

Administrative Code. —

For special rules: construction contractors, see 15 AAC 19, art. 10.

For corporate net income tax; combination and apportionment rules, see 15 AAC 20, art. 3.

For corporate net income tax; special rules for financial organizations and, see 15 AAC 20, art. 6.

For application of tax, see 15 AAC 21, art. 1.

Sec. 43.20.143.
Transportation carriers.

All business income of water transportation carriers shall be apportioned to this state in accordance with AS 43.19 (Multistate Tax Compact) as modified by the following:

the numerator of the property factor is the sum of the value for property in a fixed location, including buildings and land used in the business, and intrastate equipment and personal property determined according to AS 43.19 (Multistate Tax Compact), and the value of interstate mobile property determined on a days-spent-in-ports basis as provided in (4) of this subsection; the denominator of the property factor is determined according to AS 43.19 (Multistate Tax Compact);

the numerator of the payroll factor is the sum of the wages and salaries of employees assigned to fixed locations determined according to AS 43.19 (Multistate Tax Compact) and the wages and salaries of employees assigned to interstate mobile property determined on a days-spent-in-ports basis as provided in (4) of this subsection; the denominator of the payroll factor is determined in accordance with AS 43.19 (Multistate Tax Compact);

the numerator of the sales factor is the sum of all revenues from intrastate activities and revenues from interstate activities determined on a days-spent-in-ports basis as provided in (4) of this subsection; the denominator is determined in accordance with AS 43.19 (Multistate Tax Compact);

the portions of the numerator of the property, payroll, and sales factors which are directly related to interstate mobile property operations are determined by a ratio which the number of days spent in ports inside the state bears to the total number of days spent in ports inside and outside the state; the term “days spent in ports” does not include periods when ships are tied up because of strikes or withheld from Alaska service for repairs, or because of seasonal reduction of service; days in port are computed by dividing the total number of hours in all ports by 24.

The department shall, by regulation, adopt formulas to ensure that the total income subject to apportionment under this chapter has been apportioned only to those states having jurisdiction to tax the income. Transportation carriers other than water carriers shall apportion their income to the state by means of the formulas adopted by the department.

History.

(§ 8 ch 70 SLA 1975; am § 24 ch 113 SLA 1980)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly
AS

43.20.071

. Renumbered in 2012.

Administrative Code. —

For special rules: airlines, see 15 AAC 19, art. 8.

For special rules: land transportation carriers, see 15 AAC 19, art. 9.

For special rules: water transportation carriers, see 15 AAC 19, art. 11.

Sec. 43.20.144.
Oil and gas producers and pipelines.

All business income of a taxpayer engaged in the production of oil or gas from a lease or property in this state or engaged in the transportation of oil or gas by pipeline in this state shall be apportioned to this state in accordance with AS 43.19 (Multistate Tax Compact) as modified by this section.

A taxpayer’s business income to be apportioned under this section to the state shall be the federal taxable income of the taxpayer’s consolidated business for the tax period, except that

taxes based on or measured by net income that are deducted in the determination of the federal taxable income shall be added back; the tax levied and paid under AS 43.55 may not be added back;

intangible drilling and development costs that are deducted as expenses under 26 U.S.C. 263(c) (Internal Revenue Code) in the determination of the federal taxable income shall be capitalized and depreciated as if the option to treat them as expenses under 26 U.S.C. 263(c) (Internal Revenue Code) had not been exercised;

depletion deducted on the percentage depletion basis under 26 U.S.C. 613 (Internal Revenue Code) in the determination of the federal taxable income shall be recomputed and deducted on the cost depletion basis under 26 U.S.C. 612 (Internal Revenue Code); and

depreciation shall be computed on the basis of 26 U.S.C. 167 (Internal Revenue Code) as that section read on June 30, 1981.

A taxpayer’s business income shall be apportioned to this state by multiplying the taxpayer’s income determined under (b) of this section by the apportionment factor applicable to the taxpayer among the following factors:

the apportionment factor of a taxpayer subject to this section but not engaged in the production of oil and gas, or of gas only, as appropriate, from a lease or property in this state during the tax period is a fraction, the numerator of which is the sum of the property factor under AS 43.19 (Multistate Tax Compact) and the sales factor under (d) of this section for the taxpayer for that tax period, and the denominator of which is two;

the apportionment factor of a taxpayer subject to this section but not engaged in the pipeline transportation of oil or gas in this state during the tax period is a fraction, the numerator of which is the sum of the property factor under (e) of this section and the extraction factor under (f) of this section for the taxpayer for the tax period, and the denominator of which is two;

the apportionment factor of a taxpayer engaged both in the production of oil or gas from a lease or property in this state and in the pipeline transportation of oil or gas in this state during the tax period is a fraction, the numerator of which is the sum of the sales factor under (d) of this section, the property factor under (e) of this section, and the extraction factor under (f) of this section for the taxpayer for the tax period, and the denominator of which is three.

The sales factor of a taxpayer subject to this section is a fraction,

the numerator of which is the sum of the following for the tax period:

the tariffs allowed and received by or for the taxpayer for transporting oil or gas by pipeline in this state, regardless of whether the tariffs are paid by third parties or by entities within the taxpayer’s consolidated business; and

the total sales of the taxpayer in this state, determined in accordance with AS 43.19 (Multistate Tax Compact), but excluding

those sales already included in the tariffs described in (A) of this paragraph;

constructive sales or deemed sales of natural gas delivered to the state as payment of tax under an election made by the taxpayer under AS

43.55.014

;

fees, allowed and received, that are paid between entities within the consolidated business of the taxpayer for transporting the taxpayer’s natural gas; and

the denominator of which is the sum of the following for the tax period:

the tariffs allowed and received by or for the taxpayer’s consolidated business for transporting oil or gas by pipeline everywhere, regardless of whether the tariffs are paid by third parties or by entities within the taxpayer’s consolidated business; and

the total sales of the taxpayer’s consolidated business everywhere, determined in accordance with AS 43.19 (Multistate Tax Compact), but excluding

those sales already included in the tariffs described in (A) of this paragraph;

constructive sales or deemed sales of natural gas delivered to the state as payment of tax under an election made by the taxpayer under AS

43.55.014

or delivered in another tax jurisdiction under a law comparable to AS 43.55.014;

fees, allowed and received, that are paid between entities within the consolidated business of the taxpayer for transporting the taxpayer’s natural gas.

Unless otherwise specified in this section, the property factor of a taxpayer subject to this section is a fraction,

the numerator of which is the sum of the following for the tax period:

the average value, determined under AS 43.19 (Multistate Tax Compact), of the taxpayer’s real and tangible personal property owned or rented and used in this state during the tax period; and

the cumulative intangible drilling and development costs capitalized or expensed for federal income tax purposes under 26 U.S.C. 263(c) (Internal Revenue Code), for the taxpayer’s producing oil and gas wells in this state; and

the denominator of which is the sum of the following for the tax period:

the average value, determined under AS 43.19 (Multistate Tax Compact), of the real and tangible personal property everywhere owned or rented and used by the taxpayer’s consolidated business during the tax period; and

the cumulative intangible drilling and development costs capitalized or expensed for federal income tax purposes under 26 U.S.C. 263(c) (Internal Revenue Code), for the producing oil and gas wells everywhere of the taxpayer’s consolidated business.

The extraction factor of a taxpayer subject to this section is a fraction,

the numerator of which is the sum of the following for the tax period:

the number of barrels of the taxpayer’s oil (net of royalty to an unrelated party) produced from or allocated to leases or properties of the taxpayer in this state; and

one-sixth of the number of Mcf of the taxpayer’s gas, excluding reinjected gas but including gas subject to an election under AS

43.55.014

, (net of royalty to an unrelated party) produced from or allocated to leases or properties of the taxpayer in this state; and

the denominator of which is the sum of the following for the tax period:

the number of barrels of oil of the taxpayer’s consolidated business (net of royalty to an unrelated party) produced from or allocated to leases or properties of the taxpayer’s consolidated business everywhere; and

one-sixth of the number of Mcf of gas, excluding reinjected gas but including gas subject to an election under AS

43.55.014

, of the taxpayer’s consolidated business (net of royalty to an unrelated party) produced from or allocated to leases or properties of the taxpayer’s consolidated business everywhere.

A taxpayer that has signed a contract approved by the legislature as a result of submission of a proposed contract developed under AS 43.82 or as a result of acts by the legislature in implementing the purposes of AS 43.82, providing for payments in lieu of the tax under this chapter and that has nexus with the state solely as the result of the taxpayer’s participation in the approved qualified project that is subject to the contract or would not, but for such participation, be engaged in the production of oil or gas from a lease or property in this state or engaged in the transportation of oil or gas by pipeline in this state, is not required to file a return under this section unless required to do so by the contract.

In this section,

“barrel” means the quantity of oil contained in 42 United States gallons of 231 cubic inches each, measured at a temperature of 60 degrees Fahrenheit and an absolute pressure of 14.65 pounds per square inch;

“consolidated business” means a corporation or group of corporations having more than 50 percent common ownership, direct or indirect, or a group of corporations in which there is common control, either direct or indirect, as evidenced by any arrangement, contract, or agreement; the requirements of this chapter apply whether or not the taxpayer is the parent or controlling corporation;

“federal taxable income” means taxable income as the term is used in AS

43.20.011

—

43.20.142

;

“gas” means all hydrocarbons produced that are not defined as oil, including all liquid hydrocarbons extracted at a gas processing plant;

“lease or property” has the meaning given it by the department in its regulations;

“Mcf ” means the quantity of gas contained in 1,000 cubic feet of space, measured at a temperature of 60 degrees Fahrenheit and an absolute pressure of 14.65 pounds per square inch; and

“oil” means crude petroleum oil and other hydrocarbons, regardless of API gravity, which are produced in liquid form, including the liquid hydrocarbons sometimes known as distillate or condensate which are recovered by separation from gas other than at a gas processing plant.

History.

(§ 5 ch 116 SLA 1981; am § 8 ch 104 SLA 1998; am § 48 ch 49 SLA 2004; am § 4 ch 2 TSSLA 2006; am §§ 43, 44 ch 14 SLA 2014)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

43.20.072

. Renumbered in 2012, at which time, in subsection (h), “AS

43.20.011

—

43.20.142

” was substituted for “AS

43.20.011

—

43.20.065

” to reflect the 2012 renumbering of AS

43.20.065

.

Subsection (g) was enacted as (h). Relettered in 1998, at which time former subsection (g) was relettered as (h).

Cross references. —

For findings, intent, and nonseverability provisions related to the enactment of subsection (g), see §§ 1, 2, and 10, ch. 104, SLA 1998 in the 1998 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For special rules: water transportation carriers, see 15 AAC 19, art. 11.

For corporate net income tax; administration and credits, see 15 AAC 20, art. 2.

For corporate net income tax; special rules for oil and gas corporations, see 15 AAC 20, art. 4.

Sec. 43.20.145.
Affiliated groups.

A corporation that is a member of an affiliated group shall file a return using the water’s edge combined reporting method. A return under this section must include the following corporations if the corporations are part of a unitary business with the filing corporation:

an affiliated corporation that is eligible to be included in a federal consolidated return under 26 U.S.C. 1501 — 1505 (Internal Revenue Code) if the corporation’s property, payroll, and sales factors in the United States average

20 percent or more; or

under 20 percent, if the corporation does not meet the requirements of 26 U.S.C. 861(c);

a domestic international sales corporation; in this paragraph, “domestic international sales corporation” has the meaning given in 26 U.S.C. 992(a);

a foreign sales corporation; in this paragraph, “foreign sales corporation” has the meaning given to the term “FSC” in 26 U.S.C. 922(a);

a corporation, regardless of the place where the corporation was incorporated, if the corporation’s property, payroll, and sales factors in the United States average 20 percent or more;

a corporation that is incorporated in or does business in a country that does not impose an income tax, or that imposes an income tax at a rate lower than 90 percent of the United States income tax rate on the income tax base of the corporation in the United States, if

50 percent or more of the sales, purchases, or payments of income or expenses, exclusive of payments for intangible property, of the corporation are made directly or indirectly to one or more members of a group of corporations filing under the water’s edge combined reporting method;

the corporation does not conduct significant economic activity.

When computing taxable income for a corporation under (a) of this section, the following amounts shall be excluded:

80 percent of dividend income received from foreign corporations;

an amount treated as a dividend under 26 U.S.C. 78;

80 percent of the royalties accrued or received from a foreign corporation.

In (b)(1) and (3) of this section, a payment is considered to be received from a corporation that is part of the unitary business if the payment is received

by a member of an affiliated group included in a water’s edge combined report filed under this section; and

from a corporation in which the recipient owns 50 percent or more of the stock of the corporation.

Dividends and royalties taxable to a corporation using the water’s edge combined reporting method are in lieu of an expense attribution for income excluded under (b) of this section.

The department may require a corporation that files under (a) of this section to file a report under AS

43.20.142

and

43.20.143

prepared without regard to this section if the corporation or an affiliated corporation

fails to comply with regulations adopted under this chapter, including domestic disclosure spread sheet filing requirements; or

does not provide information that is requested by the department that is necessary for the department to audit the taxpayer’s corporate return in a reasonable period of time.

This section does not apply to taxpayers subject to AS

43.20.144

engaged in

the production of oil or gas from a lease or property in the state; or

the transportation of oil or gas by regulated pipeline in the state.

A corporation that has signed a contract approved by the legislature as a result of submission of a proposed contract developed under AS 43.82 or as a result of acts by the legislature in implementing the purposes of AS 43.82, providing for payments in lieu of the tax under this chapter and that has nexus with the state solely as the result of the corporation’s participation in the approved qualified project that is subject to the contract is not required to file a return under this section unless required to do so by the contract.

In this section,

“affiliated corporation” means a member of an affiliated group to which the taxpayer filing a return under (a) of this section belongs;

“affiliated group” means a group of two or more corporations in which 50 percent or more of the voting stock of each member of the group is directly or indirectly owned by one or more corporate or noncorporate common owners, or by one or more of the members of the group;

“foreign corporation” means a corporation created or organized outside of the United States, the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, or a possession of the United States;

“water’s edge combined reporting method” means a reporting method in which the only corporations besides the taxpayer that may be included in the return are the corporations listed in (a) of this section.

History.

(§ 3 ch 11 SLA 1991; am § 9 ch 104 SLA 1998)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

43.20.073

. Renumbered in 2012, at which time “AS

43.20.142

and

43.20.143

” was substituted for “AS

43.20.065

—

43.20.071

” in subsection (e) and “AS

43.20.144

” was substituted for “AS

43.20.072

” in subsection (f) to reflect the renumbering of AS

43.20.065

,

43.20.071

, and

43.20.072

.

Subsection (g) was enacted as (h). Relettered in 1998, at which time former subsection (g) was relettered as (h).

Cross references. —

For legislative purpose and intent in enacting this section, see §§ 1, 2, ch. 11, SLA 1991 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

For findings, intent, and nonseverability provisions related to the enactment of subsection (g), see §§ 1, 2, and 10, ch. 104, SLA 1998 in the 1998 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For special rules: water transportation carriers, see 15 AAC 19, art. 11.

For corporate net income tax; administration and credits, see 15 AAC 20, art. 2.

For corporate net income tax; combination and apportionment rules, see 15 AAC 20, art. 3.

For corporate net income tax; special rules for oil and gas corporations, see 15 AAC 20, art. 4.

Sec. 43.20.146.
Public utilities.

Notwithstanding sec. 2, art. IV, of AS 43.19 (Multistate Tax Compact), and unless otherwise provided under AS

43.20.143

—

43.20.145

, a taxpayer that is a public utility shall allocate and apportion income in accordance with the remainder of art. IV of AS 43.19 (Multistate Tax Compact).

History.

(§ 1 ch 55 SLA 2018)

Cross references. —

For provision providing that this section “does not apply to a taxpayer that files a return under AS 43.20 for a taxable year” that commences before January 1, 2019, see sec. 2, ch. 55, SLA 2018, in the 2018 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effective dates. —

Section 5,
ch. 55, SLA 2018 makes this section effective January 1, 2019.

Sec. 43.20.150.
Definitions. [Repealed, § 45 ch 113 SLA 1980.]